Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-207.
(Repealed effective January 1, 2024) Wine licenses.

The Board may grant the following licenses relating to wine:

Winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine and to sell and deliver or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. In addition, such license shall authorize the licensee to (i) operate distilling equipment on the premises of the licensee in the manufacture of spirits from fruit or fruit juices only, which shall be used only for the fortification of wine produced by the licensee; (ii) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; (iii) store wine in bonded warehouses on or off the licensed premises upon permit issued by the Board; and (iv) sell wine at retail on the premises described in the winery license for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that such wine is manufactured on the licensed premises.

Wholesale wine licenses, including those granted pursuant to §

4.1-207.1

, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine and to sell and deliver or ship the wine from one or more premises identified in the license, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to (i) persons licensed to sell such wine in the Commonwealth, (ii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth, (iii) religious congregations for use only for sacramental purposes, and (iv) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state.No wholesale wine licensee shall purchase wine for resale from a person outside the Commonwealth who does not hold a wine importer’s license unless such wholesale wine licensee holds a wine importer’s license and purchases wine for resale pursuant to the privileges of such wine importer’s license.

Wine importers’ licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Retail off-premises winery licenses to persons holding winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine at the place of business designated in the winery license, in closed containers, for off-premises consumption.

Farm winery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture wine containing 21 percent or less of alcohol by volume and to sell, deliver or ship the wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to (i) the Board, (ii) persons licensed to sell the wine so manufactured at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth. In addition, the licensee may (a) acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of wine and sell and deliver or ship this wine, in accordance with Board regulations, to the Board, persons licensed to sell wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, or persons outside the Commonwealth; (b) operate a contract winemaking facility on the premises of the licensee in accordance with Board regulations; and (c) store wine in bonded warehouses located on or off the licensed premises upon permits issued by the Board. For the purposes of this subtitle, a farm winery license shall be designated either as a Class A or Class B farm winery license in accordance with the limitations set forth in §

4.1-219

. A farm winery may enter into an agreement in accordance with Board regulations with a winery or farm winery licensee operating a contract winemaking facility.Such licenses shall also authorize the licensee to sell wine at retail at the places of business designated in the licenses, which may include no more than five additional retail establishments of the licensee. Wine may be sold at these business places for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption. In addition, wine may be pre-mixed by the licensee to be served and sold for on-premises or off-premises consumption at these business places.

Internet wine retailer license, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and ship wine, in accordance with §

4.1-209.1

and Board regulations, in closed containers to persons in the Commonwealth to whom wine may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption. Such licensee shall not be required to comply with the monthly food sale requirement established by Board regulations.

History.

Former §

4.1-207

, relating to wine licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 324, 526, 528, § 4-25.1; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, cc. 200, 559; 1985, c. 457; 1986, c. 190; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707, 810; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, c. 866; 1998, cc. 77, 208; 2000, cc. 786, 1037, 1052; 2003, cc. 564, 629, 1029, 1030; 2006, c. 845; 2007, cc. 558, 870, 932; 2008, c. 194; 2013, cc. 107, 117, 596; 2015, cc. 54, 288, 412; 2020, c. 1008; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022, repealed various sections in this chapter and recodified them. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts
2020, c. 1008 have also been given effect in
§

4.1-206.1

, effective July 1, 2021.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 2 provides: “That the second enactment of Chapter 281 and the second enactment of Chapter 282 of the Acts of Assembly of 2021, Special Session I, are amended and reenacted as follows: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 77 and 208 are identical, and in subdivision 2, in the first paragraph, in clause (ii), deleted “and” following “resale outside the Commonwealth” and added the language beginning “and (iv) owners of boats.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 786 substituted “eighteen percent” for “fourteen percent” in the first sentence of subdivision 5.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1037 and 1052 are identical, and added the sentence beginning “For the purposes of this title” in subdivision 5.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 564, in subdivision 1, inserted the clause (i) designation, and added clause (ii); and in subdivision 5, substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the first sentence, and in the next-to-last sentence, added the designation for present clause (a) and added present clause (b).

The 2003 amendment by c. 629 substituted “18” for “eighteen” in subdivision 5; and substituted “five” for “two” in the first sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and in subdivision 4, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and in subdivision 5, substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the first paragraph, and in the last paragraph, deleted “and shipment” following “delivery” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 845 deleted “and to deliver the wine to the purchasers in accordance with Board regulations. All such deliveries of wine shall be performed by the owner or any agent, officer, director, shareholder or employee of the licensee” at the end of subdivision 4; and in subdivision 5, deleted “or retail” after “wholesale” in clause (ii) of the first sentence, and deleted “including delivery of such wine to purchasers in accordance with Board regulations.
All such deliveries of wine shall be performed by the owner or any agent, officer, director, shareholder or employee of the licensee” at the end of the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 558 added subdivision 6.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 870 and 932, effective April 4, 2007, are identical, and in subdivision 2, inserted “including those granted pursuant to §

4.1-207.1

,” near the beginning and “from one or more premises identified in the license” near the middle.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 194 rewrote clause (a) of subdivision 5, which read: “acquire and receive deliveries and shipment of wine manufactured by the licensee and to sell and deliver or ship this wine, in accordance with Board regulations, to persons licensed to sell wine in the Commonwealth, §

4.1-326

notwithstanding and.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 107 and 117 are identical, and in subdivision 1, inserted clause (ii) and redesignated accordingly; in subdivision 5, inserted clause (b), redesignated former (b) as (c), and added the last sentence thereof; and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment by c. 596 added the last sentence of the second paragraph in subdivision 5.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 54 and 288 are identical, and substituted “21 percent” for “18 percent” in the first sentence of subdivision 5.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 deleted “§

4.1-326

notwithstanding” at the end of clause (ii) in subdivision 5.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1008, in subdivision 1, added clause (iv) and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the second paragraph of subdivision 5, inserted “or off-premises” in the third sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

§ 4.1-207.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2024

History.

Former §

4.1-207

, relating to wine licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 324, 526, 528, § 4-25.1; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, cc. 200, 559; 1985, c. 457; 1986, c. 190; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707, 810; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, c. 866; 1998, cc. 77, 208; 2000, cc. 786, 1037, 1052; 2003, cc. 564, 629, 1029, 1030; 2006, c. 845; 2007, cc. 558, 870, 932; 2008, c. 194; 2013, cc. 107, 117, 596; 2015, cc. 54, 288, 412; 2020, c. 1008; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to winery, wine importer and farm winery licenses, see §

4.1-206.1

; for wholesale wine licenses, see §

4.1-206.2

, and for retail off-premises wine licenses and internet wine retailer licenses, see §

4.1-206.3

.

§ 4.1-207.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2022.

History.

Former §

4.1-207.1

, relating to restricted wholesale wine licenses, was derived from Acts 2007, cc. 870, 932; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to restricted wholesale wine licenses, see §

4.1-206.2

.

As to delivery of wine or beer to retail licensee, see §

4.1-310.1

.

§ 4.1-208.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2024.

History.

Former §

4.1-208

, relating to beer licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, cc. 828, 866; 1994, c. 585; 1995, cc. 497, 518, 544, 570; 1996, cc. 443, 604; 1997, cc. 489, 646, 662; 2000, c. 1047; 2003, cc. 329, 1029, 1030; 2006, c. 845; 2007, cc. 813, 870, 932; 2012, c. 619; 2014, c. 365; 2015, c. 412; 2016, cc. 671, 710; 2017, cc. 76, 153; 2018, cc. 63, 234, 337, 665.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to brewery and limited brewery licenses, and other beer manufacturers’ licenses, see
§

4.1-206.1

; for wholesale beer licenses, see
§

4.1-206.2

; and for retail on and off-premises beer licenses and other retail beer licenses, see
§

4.1-206.3

.

§ 4.1-208.
(Repealed effective January 1, 2024) Beer licenses.

The Board may grant the following licenses relating to beer:

Brewery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to manufacture beer and to sell and deliver or ship the beer so manufactured, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to (i) persons licensed to sell the beer at wholesale; (ii) persons licensed to sell beer at retail for the purpose of resale within a theme or amusement park owned and operated by the brewery or a parent, subsidiary or a company under common control of such brewery, or upon property of such brewery or a parent, subsidiary or a company under common control of such brewery contiguous to such premises, or in a development contiguous to such premises owned and operated by such brewery or a parent, subsidiary or a company under common control of such brewery; and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth. Such license shall also authorize the licensee to sell at retail the brands of beer that the brewery owns at premises described in the brewery license for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption, provided that not less than 20 percent of the volume of beer sold for on-premises consumption in any calendar year is manufactured on the licensed premises.Such license may also authorize individuals holding a brewery license to (a) operate a facility designed for and utilized exclusively for the education of persons in the manufacture of beer, including sampling by such individuals of beer products, within a theme or amusement park located upon the premises occupied by such brewery, or upon property of such person contiguous to such premises, or in a development contiguous to such premises owned and operated by such person or a wholly owned subsidiary or (b) offer samples of the brewery’s products to individuals visiting the licensed premises, provided that such samples shall be provided only to individuals for consumption on the premises of such facility or licensed premises and only to individuals to whom such products may be lawfully sold.

Limited brewery licenses, to breweries that manufacture no more than 15,000 barrels of beer per calendar year, provided that (i) the brewery is located on a farm in the Commonwealth on land zoned agricultural and owned or leased by such brewery or its owner and (ii) agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown on the farm. The licensed premises shall be limited to the portion of the farm on which agricultural products, including barley, other grains, hops, or fruit, used by such brewery in the manufacture of its beer are grown and that is contiguous to the premises of such brewery where the beer is manufactured, exclusive of any residence and the curtilage thereof. However, the Board may, with notice to the local governing body in accordance with the provisions of §

4.1-230

, also approve other portions of the farm to be included as part of the licensed premises. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” means (a) land zoned as an agricultural district or classification or (b) land otherwise permitted by a locality for limited brewery use. For purposes of this subdivision, “land zoned agricultural” does not include land zoned “residential conservation.” Except for the limitation on land zoned “residential conservation,” nothing in this definition shall otherwise limit or affect local zoning authority.Limited brewery licensees shall be treated as breweries for all purposes of this subtitle except as otherwise provided in this subdivision.

Bottlers’ licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of beer in closed containers and to bottle, sell and deliver or ship it, in accordance with Board regulations to (i) wholesale beer licensees for the purpose of resale, (ii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Wholesale beer licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of beer and to sell and deliver or ship the beer from one or more premises identified in the license, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to (i) persons licensed under this chapter to sell such beer at wholesale or retail for the purpose of resale, (ii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.No wholesale beer licensee shall purchase beer for resale from a person outside the Commonwealth who does not hold a beer importer’s license unless such wholesale beer licensee holds a beer importer’s license and purchases beer for resale pursuant to the privileges of such beer importer’s license.

Beer importers’ licenses, which shall authorize persons licensed within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and deliver or ship beer into the Commonwealth, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers, to persons in the Commonwealth licensed to sell beer at wholesale for the purpose of resale.

Retail on-premises beer licenses to:

Hotels, restaurants, and clubs, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer, either with or without meals, only in dining areas and other designated areas of such restaurants, or in dining areas, private guest rooms, and other designated areas of such hotels or clubs, for consumption only in such rooms and areas. For purposes of this subdivision, “other designated areas” includes outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided that such outdoor dining areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

.

Persons operating dining cars, buffet cars, and club cars of trains, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer, either with or without meals, in the dining cars, buffet cars, and club cars so operated by them for on-premises consumption when carrying passengers.

Persons operating sight-seeing boats, or special or charter boats, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer, either with or without meals, on such boats operated by them for on-premises consumption when carrying passengers.

Grocery stores located in any town or in a rural area outside the corporate limits of any city or town, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer for on-premises consumption in such establishments. No license shall be granted unless it appears affirmatively that a substantial public demand for such licensed establishment exists and that public convenience and the purposes of this subtitle will be promoted by granting the license.

Persons operating food concessions at coliseums, stadia, or similar facilities, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer, in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, during the performance of professional sporting exhibitions, events or performances immediately subsequent thereto, to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, and additional locations designated by the Board in such coliseums, stadia, or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license.

Persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena or similar facility which has seating for more than 3,500 persons and is located in Albemarle, Augusta, Pittsylvania, Nelson, or Rockingham Counties. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell beer during the performance of any event, in paper, plastic or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license.

Persons operating food concessions at exhibition or exposition halls, convention centers or similar facilities located in any county operating under the urban county executive form of government or any city which is completely surrounded by such county, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer during the event, in paper, plastic or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, to patrons or attendees within all seating areas, exhibition areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, and such additional locations designated by the Board in such facilities, for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license. For purposes of this subsection, “exhibition or exposition halls” and “convention centers” mean facilities conducting private or public trade shows or exhibitions in an indoor facility having in excess of 100,000 square feet of floor space.

A nonprofit museum exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, located in the Town of Front Royal, and dedicated to educating the consuming public about historic beer products, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board. The privileges of this license shall be limited to the premises of the museum, regularly occupied and utilized as such.

Retail off-premises beer licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer in closed containers for off-premises consumption.

Retail off-premises brewery licenses to persons holding a brewery license which shall authorize the licensee to sell beer at the place of business designated in the brewery license, in closed containers which shall include growlers and other reusable containers, for off-premises consumption.

Retail on-and-off premises beer licenses to persons enumerated in subdivisions 6 a and 6 d, which shall accord all the privileges conferred by retail on-premises beer licenses and in addition, shall authorize the licensee to sell beer in closed containers for off-premises consumption.

Internet beer retailer license, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and ship beer, in accordance with §

4.1-209.1

and Board regulations, in closed containers to persons in the Commonwealth to whom beer may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption. Such licensee shall not be required to comply with the monthly food sale requirement established by Board regulations.

Any farm winery or limited brewery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board in accordance with this subtitle and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery or limited brewery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in §

15.2-2307

, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of this section or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery or limited brewery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery or limited brewery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016 may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery or limited brewery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016 may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of this subtitle and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery or limited brewery on or after July 1, 2016.

History.

Former §

4.1-208

, relating to beer licenses, was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, cc. 828, 866; 1994, c. 585; 1995, cc. 497, 518, 544, 570; 1996, cc. 443, 604; 1997, cc. 489, 646, 662; 2000, c. 1047; 2003, cc. 329, 1029, 1030; 2006, c. 845; 2007, cc. 813, 870, 932; 2012, c. 619; 2014, c. 365; 2015, c. 412; 2016, cc. 671, 710; 2017, cc. 76, 153; 2018, cc. 63, 234, 337, 665.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 828 amended former § 4-25, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendment by c. 828 has been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 828, the phrase “or performances immediately subsequent thereto” was inserted after “exhibitions, events” in subdivision 5 e.

Acts
2007, cc. 870 and
932, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall implement the provisions of this act consistent with an opinion of the Attorney General dated April 18, 2006, within 90 days of the effective date of this act.”

Acts
2016, cc. 671 and
710, cl. 2 was codified as subsection B of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts
2016, cc. 671 and
710, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) has a pending application with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board (the Board) for a license as a farm winery or limited brewery in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery or limited brewery use, and (iii) subsequently is issued a license as a farm winery or limited brewery shall be allowed to engage in such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of this act or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery or limited brewery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery or limited brewery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery or limited brewery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery or limited brewery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2018, cc. 63 and
234, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2018 cc. 63 and
234, cl. 3 provides: “The provisions of this act shall become effective on April 30, 2022, for a brewery which has entered into: 1) a Performance Agreement with the Commonwealth of Virginia Development Opportunity Fund, on or about April 20, 2016; 2) a Performance Agreement entitled ‘Regarding Operation Period Economic Development Grant’, on or about April 20, 2016, and 3) a commercial lease agreement, on or about April 14, 2017.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1047 added the last two sentences in subdivision 1, and deleted “(i) has seating for more than 20,000 persons and is located in any county with a population between 210,000 and 216,000 or in any city with a population between 392,000 and 394,000 or (ii)” following “similar facility which” near the beginning of subdivision 5 f.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 329 substituted “sight-seeing boats, or special or charter boats” for “boats for which certificates as a sight-seeing carrier by boat, or a special or charter party by boat have been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-2099.20

” in subdivision 5 c.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and in subdivision 6, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subdivision 7, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; and in subdivision 8, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 845, in the first sentence in subdivision 1, deleted former clauses (ii) and (iii) which read: “(ii) persons licensed to sell beer at retail for the purpose of resale, only as provided in subdivision B 4 of §

4.1-216

, (iii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state,” inserted clause (ii) and redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (iii); and deleted “and to deliver the beer to purchasers in accordance with Board regulations. All such deliveries of beer shall be performed by the owner or any agent, officer, director, shareholder or employee of the licensee” at the end of subdivisions 6, 7, and 8, and made related changes in subdivision 7.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Albemarle, Augusta, Pittsylvania, or Rockingham Counties” for “any county with a population between 65,000 and 70,000” in subdivision 5 f.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 870 and 932, effective April 4, 2007, are identical, and substituted “the beer from one or more premises identified in the license,” for “it” near the beginning of subdivision 3.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 619, in subdivision 1, added the last sentence of the first paragraph and in the second paragraph, inserted the clause (a) designator, substituted “subsidiary or (b) offer samples of the brewery’s products to individuals visiting the licensed premises, provided that such samples shall be provided” for “subsidiary. Provided, however, that such samples may be provided” and inserted “or licensed premises.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 365 added subdivision 2 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and in subdivision 9, substituted “6 a and 6 b” for “5 a and 5 b.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 added the last two sentences in subdivision 6 a and inserted “Nelson” in subdivision 6 f.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 671 and 710 are identical, and added the last three sentences in the first paragraph in subdivision 2 and added subsection B. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 76 and 153 are identical, and inserted “or in single original metal cans” in subdivisions A 6 e through A 6 g.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 63 and 234, effective January 1, 2019, are identical and added “provided that not less than 20 percent of the volume of beer sold for on-premises consumption in any calendar year is manufactured on the licensed premises” at the end of the first paragraph of subdivision A 1.

The 2018 amendment by c. 337 added subdivision A 10.

The 2018 amendment by c. 665 added subdivision A 6 h.